Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 25 Execution

9-25-1.
“Trustee” defined.

The word “trustee”, wherever occurring in this chapter, shall be deemed to include the words “attorney”, “agent”, “factor”, or “debtor.”

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 596; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-1

.

9-25-2.
Time of issue.

Executions shall issue at the request of the moving party, unless stayed by applicable procedural rules or unless otherwise ordered or provided by law; however, no execution shall issue before forty-eight (48) hours have elapsed after the entry of judgment.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 604; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-2

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 43; P.L. 1984, ch. 357, § 1.

9-25-3.
Limitation on issuance.

Executions, original or alias, may be issued by any court at any time within six (6) years from the rendition of the judgment originally or from the return day of the last execution.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 606; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-3

.

9-25-4.
Stay of execution.

Any justice of the supreme, superior, or district court may, upon motion and for cause shown, stay execution upon any judgment or decree rendered in any court, until further order. With respect to a judgment or decree for child support, good cause shall be deemed to be shown when the family court, pursuant to §

15-5-16.2.4

, has suspended payment of child support arrearages.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 605; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 3; P.L. 1948, ch. 2086, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-4

; P.L. 1990, ch. 477, § 2.

9-25-5.
Fee prerequisite to issuance.

No person shall be entitled to an execution until the fee therefor shall have been paid.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 610; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-5

.

9-25-6.
Style of executions.

Executions issued by any court shall issue in the name of the state of Rhode Island and shall be signed, sealed, and run in like manner as original writs.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 603; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-6

; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 8, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 8, effective June 23, 2021.

9-25-7.
Form of superior court writ of execution.

A writ of execution issued by the superior court shall be substantially in the following form:

THE STATE OF RHODE ISLAND. SC. To the sheriffs of our several counties, or to their deputies, (SEAL) Greeting: Whereas of by the consideration of the SUPERIOR COURT holden at did on the day of recover judgment against of for the sum of debt (or damages) and costs of suit, as to us appears of record, whereof execution remains to be done: We command you, therefore, that of the goods and chattels and real estate of the said , within your precinct, you cause to be levied and paid unto the said the aforesaid sums, being in the whole, with 50 cents more for this writ; and thereof also to satisfy yourself for your own fees; [and for want of the goods and chattels and real estate of the said to be found in your precinct to satisfy and pay the same as aforesaid, we command you to take the body of the said and
commit unto our correctional institution in your precinct, therein to be kept until pay the full sum above mentioned, with your fees, or until be discharged by the said or otherwise by order of law.] Hereof fail not, and make true return of this writ and of your doings thereon to our superior court at for our county of on the day of A.D. . Witness, the seal of our superior court at this day of in the year . , Clerk.

Click to view

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 614; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-7

; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 8, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 8, effective June 23, 2021.

9-25-8.
Form of district court writ of execution.

A writ of execution issued by a district court shall be substantially in the following form:

THE STATE OF RHODE ISLAND. SC. To the sheriff, his or her deputy or to either of the town sergeants or constables in the county of (SEAL) Greeting: Whereas of at a DISTRICT COURT holden at did on the day of recover judgment of said court against of for the sum of debt or (damages), and costs of suit taxed at , as of record of said court doth appear, which sums, in the whole, amount to for which execution remains to be done: We command you, therefore, that of the goods and chattels and real estate of the said within your precinct, you levy the said sum of , together with 15 cents for this execution, as also your lawful fees for serving the same, and therewith satisfy and pay the said ; [and for want of the goods and chattels and real estate of the said to be by you found within your precinct, to satisfy and pay the same sums aforesaid, we command you to take the body of the said into your custody, and safely secure in our jail in until satisfy and pay the said the sums aforesaid and your fees, or until be by the said therefrom discharged, or otherwise by order of law.] Hereof fail not, and make true return of this writ and of your doings thereon, on the day of A.D. . Witness, the seal of the district court of the judicial district, this day of in the year . , Clerk (or Justice.)

Click to view

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 616; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-8

; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 8, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 8, effective June 23, 2021.

9-25-9.
Form of superior court writs of possession.

Writs of possession issuing from the superior court shall be substantially in the following form:

If an officer, serving an execution issued under this section on a judgment for the plaintiff for possession of land or tenements, removes personal property belonging to a person other than the plaintiff from the land or tenements and places it upon the sidewalk, highway, street, or way on which land or tenements abut, he or she may forthwith and before the expiration of the time limited in any statute or ordinance for the removal of obstructions in the street, remove the personal property and cause it to be stored for the benefit of the owners thereof.

Whoever accepts the personal property on storage from the officer shall have a lien thereon for reasonable storage fees and for reasonable expenses of removing it to the place of storage, but the lien shall not be enforced by sale of the property until the property has been kept on storage for at least thirty (30) days.

If the owner of the property is present and claims it when it is so removed from the land or tenements, the officer shall not remove and store it, and his or her act of placing it upon the sidewalk, highway, street, or way shall be deemed to be the act of the owner, who alone shall be held to answer therefor.

THE STATE OF RHODE ISLAND. SC. To the sheriffs of our several counties or to their deputies or to a certified constable, (SEAL) ; ; Greeting: Whereas of by the consideration of the SUPERIOR COURT holden at did on the day of recover judgment for the possession of with the privileges and appurtenances thereto belonging against of who had unjustly withholden from the possession thereof, and also by the consideration of the same court recovered judgment against the said for the sum of costs of suit, as to us appears of record, whereof execution remains to be done: We command you, therefore, that without delay you cause the said to have possession of and in the said with the privileges and appurtenances thereunto belonging. We also command you that of the goods and chattels and real estate of the said , within your precinct, you cause to be levied and paid to the said the aforesaid sum of , and thereof also to satisfy yourself for your own fees; [and for want of the goods and chattels and real estate of the said to be found in your precinct to satisfy and pay the same as aforesaid, we command you to take the body of the said and commit unto our correctional institution in your precinct, therein to be kept until
pay the full sum above mentioned, with your fees, or until be discharged by the said or otherwise by order of law.] Hereof fail not, and make true return of this writ and of your doings thereon to our superior court at on the day of A.D. . Witness, the seal of our superior court at this day of in the year . , Clerk.

Click to view

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 615; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 13; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-9

; P.L. 1966, ch. 24, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 11; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 11; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 8, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 8, effective June 23, 2021.

9-25-10.
Form of district court writs of possession.

Writs of possession, issuing from a district court, shall be substantially in the following form:

If an officer, serving an execution issued under this section on a judgment for the plaintiff for possession of land or tenements, removes personal property belonging to a person other than the plaintiff from the land or tenements and places it upon the sidewalk, highway, street, or way on which land or tenements abut, he or she may forthwith and before the expiration of the time limited in any statute or ordinance for the removal of obstructions in the street, remove the personal property and cause it to be stored for the benefit of the owners thereof.

Whoever accepts the personal property on storage from the officer shall have a lien thereon for reasonable storage fees and for reasonable expenses of removing it to the place of storage, but the lien shall not be enforced by sale of the property until the property has been kept on storage for at least thirty (30) days.

If the owner of the property is present and claims it when it is so removed from the land or tenements, the officer shall not remove and store it, and his or her act of placing it upon the sidewalk, highway, street, or way shall be deemed to be the act of the owner, who alone shall be held to answer therefor.

THE STATE OF RHODE ISLAND. SC. To the sheriff, his or her deputy, or to either of the town sergeants or constables in the county of (SEAL) Greeting: Whereas of at a DISTRICT COURT holden at did on the day of recover judgment of said court for the possession of with the privileges and appurtenances thereto belonging against of who had unjustly withholden from the possession thereof, and also, by the consideration of the same court, recovered judgment against the said for the sum of costs of suit, as of record of said court doth appear, whereof execution remains to be done: We command you, therefore, that without delay you cause the said to have possession of and in the said with the privileges and appurtenances thereunto belonging. We also command you that of the goods and chattels and real estate of the said within your precinct, you cause to be levied and paid to the said the aforesaid sum of with 15 cents more for this writ, and thereof also to satisfy yourself for your own fees; [and for want of the goods and chattels and real estate of the said to be found in your precinct to satisfy and pay the same as aforesaid, we command you to take the body of the said and commit unto our correctional institution, in your precinct, therein to be kept until pay the full sum above mentioned, with your fees, or until be discharged by the said or otherwise by order of law.] Hereof fail not, and make true return of this writ and of your doings thereon, on the day of A.D. . Witness, the seal of the district court of the judicial district, this day of in the year . , Clerk (or Justice.)

Click to view

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 617; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-10

; P.L. 1966, ch. 24, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 8, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 8, effective June 23, 2021.

9-25-11.
Bracketed words in forms.

If the execution issued by any court is one which may run against the body of the defendant, the words included in brackets in the forms prescribed in §§

9-25-7

—

9-25-10

shall be retained, otherwise they shall be stricken out.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 618; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-11

.

9-25-12.
Form of execution against trustee or trust estate.

In every execution issued against any defendant in an action or suit in which another person shall have been charged as the trustee of the defendant, there shall be inserted next after the words “goods and chattels and real estate of the defendant” the words “and especially the personal estate of the said defendant in the hands or possession of (here insert the name of the trustee) charged as trustee of the said defendant to the extent of (here insert the amount for which the trustee is charged)”; or if the trustee shall be charged by his or her default in not filing the necessary affidavit in the cause, insert in lieu of the clause fixing the extent to which the trustee shall be charged, after the words “charged as trustee of the said defendant”, the words “by the default of the said trustee to file his or her affidavit in said cause”.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 622; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-12

.

9-25-13.
Variation of forms to comply with law.

The court issuing an execution in any case in which no form shall be prescribed may vary the forms as provided in this chapter so as to comply with the law governing the particular case.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 620; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-13

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 72.

9-25-14.
Marginal notations on execution.

The clerk of any court or justice issuing an execution shall note on the margin or in the body thereof the time when the judgment recited in the execution was rendered, and if the execution was awarded against the defendant in an action brought against him or her upon any penal statute or in an action sounding in tort in which the title to real estate was not in dispute, the marginal notation shall so state.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 611; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-14

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 43.

9-25-15.
Cases in which execution may issue against body.

An execution, original, alias, or pluries, may issue against the body of a defendant not exempt from arrest in an action which shall have been brought upon a penal statute, or in an action sounding in tort in which the title to real estate was not in dispute, or against bail in criminal cases, or whenever the defendant shall have been arrested and held to bail upon a writ of arrest or writ of mesne process therein, or whenever it shall be made to appear to the court which rendered the judgment in the action, or to any justice thereof, that the defendant is about to leave the state without leaving therein sufficient real or personal estate to satisfy the judgment, or that the defendant has been guilty of fraud in fact involving moral turpitude or intentional wrong either in contracting the debt for the recovery of which the judgment was rendered or in the concealment, detention or disposition of his or her property; provided, however, that no execution, original, alias or pluries, shall issue against the body of a defendant unless so ordered by a justice of the superior court or a justice of a district court upon the written ex parte motion of a party named in the action.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 613; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-15

; P.L. 1961, ch. 167, § 2; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 43.

9-25-16.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 784, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 479, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-16

; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 44, effective January 10, 1966.

9-25-17.
Execution against female on small judgment.

No execution shall issue against the body of any female on any judgment founded on a contract where the debt or damages do not exceed fifty dollars ($50.00); but in such case, the execution shall issue against the goods and chattels and real estate of the female against whom the judgment shall have been rendered.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 612; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-17

.

9-25-18.
Setoff of judgments and execution for balance.

Whenever any court shall render final judgment for debts or damages in two (2) or more personal actions pending at the same time, in which the parties shall be reversed, and shall sue and be sued in the same right and capacity, the court shall set off the debts or damages recovered in the judgments and, provided no execution has already been issued upon either judgment, shall issue execution for the balance only, in favor of the party to whom it shall be due, with costs, if costs were recovered, and for costs only, if no balance upon the setoff is left; and a separate execution shall be issued in favor of the other party for costs, if costs were recovered by him or her; provided, that in every such case hereby provided for, the court shall have power to make such orders as may be required to carry out the intent of this section.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 435; G.L. 1909, ch. 294, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 344, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-18

.

9-25-19.
Replacement of lost or destroyed executions.

The superior court, family court, or district court, at any time upon application made by the party in favor of whom any original, alias, or pluries execution has issued and upon proof that the execution has been lost or destroyed previous to the satisfaction thereof, may issue, or authorize the clerk of the court to issue, another execution in the place of the one so lost or destroyed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 607; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-19

; P.L. 1979, ch. 373, § 8.

9-25-20.
Return of executions.

Every execution issued by the supreme or superior or family court shall, unless otherwise specially provided therein, be made returnable thereto one year from the date of the execution, and shall be returned by the officer charged therewith; and if the officer shall not return the execution within that time, he or she shall be liable therefor as by law prescribed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 608; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-20

; P.L. 1979, ch. 373, § 8; P.L. 1982, ch. 130, § 1.

9-25-21.
Return of district court executions.

Every execution issued by any district court shall, unless otherwise specially provided therein, be returnable one year after the date thereof, and be returned to the district court which issued it.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 609; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-21

; P.L. 1982, ch. 130, § 1.

9-25-22.
Execution against defendant released from arrest by court.

Whenever the court in which an original writ is returnable shall release the defendant therein from arrest and discharge the bail, if any taken thereon, the execution in such actions shall not issue against the body of the defendant so released, but against his or her goods and chattels and real estate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 619; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-22

.

9-25-23.
Execution against attached property.

Whenever final judgment or decree shall be rendered for the plaintiff in any action or suit in which a writ was served attaching real estate, or goods and chattels, or stock or shares in any incorporated company, the execution issued on the judgment or decree shall be levied on the property so attached, as soon as may be; but if execution shall not be so levied within one year from the day of entry of judgment or decree, the property attached shall be discharged from the attachment. In computing the periods of time provided in this section, time during which execution is stayed shall not be included.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 621; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-23

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 43; P.L. 1979, ch. 373, § 8; P.L. 1982, ch. 130, § 1.

9-25-24.
Trustee’s affidavit as to want of notice, accident, mistake, or excusable neglect.

If any person named as the trustee of a defendant, who shall have been charged as trustee by reason of his or her default, shall make affidavit as to whether or not he or she had personal property of the defendant in his or her hands or possession at the time of the service of a writ in the action or suit upon him or her, and stating the amount or articles, if any, so in his or her hands, and that he or she failed to file an affidavit therein before he or she was charged by the court as the trustee of the defendant, either from want of actual notice of the service of the writ, or by accident, mistake, or excusable neglect, and shall give the affidavit to the officer charged with the service of the execution, who shall annex the affidavit to his or her return on the execution, or, if execution has not issued, if the person shall file the affidavit in the court in which he or she has been charged, with the clerk, if there is a clerk, otherwise with the justice thereof, and shall pay to the officer, clerk, or justice, respectively, the money paid for his or her attendance at the time of the service of the writ, and another like sum, and, in case execution has issued, shall pay to the officer the sum stated in his or her affidavit to be so in his or her hands, if any, or so much thereof as may be necessary to satisfy the execution, or, if the property in his or her hand as disclosed by his or her affidavit consists of specific articles, shall then deliver the articles to the officer, no further proceeding shall be commenced against the trustee, except as is provided in §

10-17-14

in case of a false answer or affidavit by the person summoned as trustee, and the officer shall pay the money paid to him or her by the trustee to the plaintiff, or take the specific articles on the execution.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 623; G.L. 1909, ch. 303, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 353, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 552, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

9-25-24

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 43; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 72.

9-25-25.
Execution against real estate held in partnership name.

Whenever a writ of execution is issued by the superior court or district court against real estate, title to which is held in the name of a partnership, the writ shall include, among other things, the name of the partnership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 93, § 1.